Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB607.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 106. Effect of Declaration of Disaster Emergency.-- (a) It shall be unlawful for a landlord to do any of the following during a disaster emergency declared by the Governor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor):(1) Evict or attempt to evict a tenant unemployed, separated from employment or unable to find employment as a result of the 12345678910111213141516171819 declaration of disaster emergency.(2) Without the express consent of the tenant, enter the leased premises for purposes of showing the premises to prospective buyers or tenants.(b) A landlord found to be in violation of this section shall be subject to a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) per occurrence.(c) This section shall apply only to residential leaseholds and not to commercial leaseholds.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0607PN0615 - 2 - 12345678910